Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-5.4] Failure to pay or remit the
inspection, quarantine, and eradication service fee; fines. (a)
The following fines shall be imposed for failure to pay, bill, or remit the
inspection, quarantine, and eradication service fee as provided for in section
150A-5.3:

(1) A person responsible for paying the freight
charges to the transportation company who fails to pay the fee; or

(2) A transportation company that fails to:

(A) Bill the fee, within fifteen days of the
delivery of the freight, to the person responsible for paying the freight
charges to the transportation company; or

(B) Remit the fee to the department within
forty-five days of collecting the fee from the person responsible for paying
the freight charges to the transportation company,

shall pay a fine of two times the amount of the
inspection, quarantine, and eradication service fee or $50, whichever is
higher.

(b) All fines shall be paid to the
department and deposited into the pest inspection, quarantine, and eradication
fund under section 150A-4.5. [L 2010, c 173, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next